Tennessee, session 114, SB1704.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 70-4-112, is amended by deleting the
section.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 70-4-122, is amended by deleting the
section.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1704
009673
- 1 -